Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 1 General Provisions
28-1-113. Waiver of notice.

A legally competent person in his or her own behalf;

The guardian of the estate of an incompetent person in behalf of his or her ward, unless the interests of the ward and the guardian in the hearing are adverse;

An incompetent person in his or her own behalf if the interests of the guardian and the ward in the hearing are adverse, or if there is no guardian;

Either parent in behalf of a minor child, if the child is under fourteen (14) years of age and in the actual custody of the parent, or the minor child in his or her own behalf if the minor child has attained fourteen (14) years of age;

A guardian ad litem in behalf of an incompetent person;

A trustee in behalf of a beneficiary of his or her trust; or

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 13; 1951, No. 255, § 3; 1975, No. 620, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2013.

28-1-114. [Repealed.]

For good cause and at any time within the period allowed for appeal after the final termination of the administration of the estate of a decedent or ward, the court may vacate or modify an order or grant a rehearing. However, no such power shall exist as to any order from which an appeal has been taken or to set aside the probate of a will after the time allowed for contest thereof.

No vacation or modification under this section shall affect any act previously done or any right previously acquired in reliance on such an order or judgment.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2015.

28-1-116. Appeals.

Appeal Permitted.Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a person aggrieved by an order of the circuit court in probate proceedings under the provisions of the Probate Code may obtain a review of the order by the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals.

Orders Which Are Not Appealable.There shall be no appeal from an order:

(c)

Stay of Appeal.

When an appeal is taken with respect to any appealable order in the administration of a decedent's estate made prior to the order of final distribution, other than an order admitting or denying the probate of a will or appointing or refusing to appoint a personal representative, the circuit court or appellate court, in its discretion, may order that the appeal be:

(g)

Applicability of General Appellate Rules.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2016; Acts 2003, No. 1185, § 273.

28-1-117. Use of certified mail permitted.

Anything permitted or required by the Probate Code to be served or transmitted by registered mail may be served or transmitted either by registered mail or by certified mail, and return receipts for the delivery of certified mail shall be received in the courts as prima facie evidence of the delivery to the same extent as return receipts for the delivery of registered mail.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 29, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2017.

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

28-1-118. Deceased viable fetus.

For purposes of the Probate Code, a “deceased viable fetus” is considered a person and decedent so that the probate division of circuit court may have jurisdiction for the administration, settlement, and distribution of the deceased fetus's estate.

No person shall be liable under subsection (a) of this section when the death of the fetus results from a legal abortion or from the fault of the pregnant woman carrying the fetus.

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Probate Law, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 631.

District court concluded that the Arkansas Supreme Court would extend its decision in Aka, which held that wrongful death suits could be brought on behalf of unborn, viable fetuses, to allow a negligence suit to be filed on a child's behalf, seeking to recover for alleged negligently-inflicted injuries that the child sustained in utero, before she was born. The district court noted that the state supreme court had found persuasive the state legislature's decision to expand the definition of “person” in the homicide and probate laws, §5-1-102(13)(B)(i)(b) and subsection (a) of this section, to include viable fetuses, thereby giving statutory protection to unborn children, and that it would be absurd to think that less protection would be provided under Arkansas law to children who suffered in utero injury, but nevertheless managed to be born.Crussell v. Electrolux Home Prods., 499 F. Supp. 2d 1137 (W.D Ark. 2007).

Publisher's Notes. For Comments regarding the Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act, see Commentaries Volume B.

Cross References. Disclaimer by custodian of minor, §9-26-218.

Effective Dates. Acts 2003, No. 610, § 19: Sept. 1, 2003.

ALR.

Relinquishment of interest by life beneficiary in possession as accelerating remainder of which there is substitutional gift in case primary remainderman does not survive life beneficiary. 7 A.L.R.4th 1084.

Creditor's right to prevent debtor's renunciation of benefit under will or debtor's election to take under will. 39 A.L.R.4th 633.

Am. Jur. 23 Am. Jur. 2d, Desc. & D., § 157 et seq.

Ark. L. Notes.

Looney, Use of the Disclaimer as an Estate Planning Device under Arkansas Law, 1985 Ark. L. Notes 67.

C.J.S. 26B C.J.S., Desc. & D., § 69.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Legislative Survey, Decedents' Estates, 4 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 591.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As originally codified, chapter 2 was not divided into subchapters. However, subsequent to the enactment of Acts 2003, No. 610, the Arkansas Code Revision Commission determined that, for codification purposes, it would be necessary to reorganize chapter 2. Accordingly, Acts 2003, No. 610, §§ 1-19, were codified as new subchapter 2. Newly designated subchapter 1 was listed as a repealed subchapter.

Publisher's Notes. Former chapter 2, designated herein as subchapter 1, the former Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act, was repealed by Acts 2003, No. 610, § 20. The chapter was derived from the following sources:

28-2-101. Acts 1981, No. 348, §§ 1, 6, 9; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-3201, 62-3206.

28-2-102. Acts 1981, No. 348, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3205.

28-2-103. Acts 1981, No. 348, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3207.

28-2-104. Acts 1981, No. 348, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3202.

28-2-105. Acts 1981, No. 348, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3208.

28-2-106. Acts 1981, No. 348, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3203.

28-2-107. Acts 1981, No. 348, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3202.

28-2-108. Acts 1981, No. 348, §§ 2, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-3202, 62-3204.

28-2-109. Acts 1981, No. 348, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3202.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1775, § 1.

28-1-119. Access to decedent's autopsy records.

As used in this section, “healthcare provider” means a person, corporation, facility, or institution licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by the law of this state to administer health care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession.

A healthcare provider who, in good faith, releases copies of a decedent's autopsy records upon the authorization of any of the individuals listed under §28-1-102(19)(B) shall not be held liable under any criminal law or held civilly liable to the deceased patient's estate or to any other person.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 722, § 2.

28-1-106. Referees and probate clerks.

28-1-108. Records.

28-1-115. Vacation and modification of orders.